Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.13
Minimum values; basis.

The minimum values as specified in sections 44-407.16 to 44-407.19 and 44-407.21 of any paid-up annuity, cash surrender, or death benefits available under an annuity contract shall be based upon minimum nonforfeiture amounts as defined in section 44-407.14.

Laws 1979, LB 354, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 4.